District of Columbia statutes.
38-2733

Grant awards for DC Leveraging Educational Assistance Partnership Program.

(a)

From local funds appropriated annually for the DC Leveraging Educational Assistance Partnership Program, the State Education Office shall make available grant awards to pay for qualified higher education expenses for no fewer than 800 eligible students attending eligible institutions. If fewer than 800 eligible students from eligible institutions apply, the funds may be used to grant awards to eligible students attending eligible institutions of higher education outside of the District of Columbia.

(b)

An eligible student attending an eligible institution shall have paid on the student’s behalf under this section:

(A)

Not more than $5,000 for any one academic year; and

(B)

A total of not more than $25,000 over 5 years.

(c)

Payments under this section shall be prorated for eligible students who attend an eligible institution on less than a full-time basis.

History

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 4024, 53 DCR 6899

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4024 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4024 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4024 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).